Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF42.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 41A.30, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. (b) "Aircraft" has the meaning given in section 296A.01, subdivision 3. (c) "Aviation gasoline" has the meaning given in section 296A.01, subdivision 7. (d) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of agriculture. (e) "Jet fuel" has the meaning given in section 296A.01, subdivision 8. (f) "Qualifying taxpayer" means a taxpayer, as defined in section 290.01, subdivision 6, that is engaged in the business of: (1) producing sustainable aviation fuel; or (2) blending sustainable aviation fuel with aviation gasoline or jet fuel. (g) "Sustainable aviation fuel" means liquid fuel that: (1) is derived fromnew text begin :new text end new text begin (i)new text end biomass, as defined in section 41A.15, subdivision 2e; new text begin (ii) gaseous carbon oxides produced from biomass or direct air capture; or new text end new text begin (iii) green electrolytic hydrogen; new text end (2) is not derived from palm fatty acid distillates; and (3) achieves at least a 50 percent life cycle greenhouse gas emissions reduction in comparison with petroleum-based aviation gasoline, aviation turbine fuel, and jet fuel as determined by a test that shows: (i) that the fuel production pathway achieves at least a 50 percent life cycle greenhouse gas emissions reduction in comparison with petroleum-based aviation gasoline, aviation turbine fuel, and jet fuel utilizing the most recent version of Argonne National Laboratory's Greenhouse Gases, Regulated Emissions, and Energy Use in Technologies (GREET) model that accounts for reduced emissions throughout the fuel production process; or (ii) that the fuel production pathway achieves at least a 50 percent reduction of the aggregate attributional core life cycle emissions and the positive induced land use change values under the life cycle methodology for sustainable aviation fuels adopted by the International Civil Aviation Organization with the agreement of the United States.